Utah statutes.
53-7-225.6.   Inspection and testing of fire alarm systems -- Certification and exceptions.

(1) (a)  Each person, other than fire and building inspectors and electricians licensed under Title 58, Chapter 55, Utah Construction Trades Licensing Act, engaged in the inspection and testing of fire alarm systems shall be certified by the state fire marshal.

(b)  The board shall by administrative rule prescribe:

(i)  an application form; and

(ii)  standards for certification qualification and for renewal and revocation.

(2)  Applicants for certification as a fire alarm system inspector and tester shall:

(a)  submit a written application on the form prescribed by the board;

(b)  provide evidence of competency as required by the board; and

(c)  submit the fee established under Subsection (3).

(3)  The board may establish an application fee under Section 63J-1-504.



Amended by Chapter 183, 2009 General Session

